District of Columbia statutes.
47-1273

Assessments on ICF/IID.

(a)

Except as provided in § 47-1278(d), each ICF/IID in the District of Columbia shall pay an assessment of 5.5% of the gross revenues per annum.

(b)

Each ICF/IID shall pay the assessment required by subsection (a) of this section in quarterly installments.

(c)

The Mayor shall provide notice of the amount of the assessment for the quarter to each ICF/IID no later than 30 days after the end of each quarter.

(d)

The assessment required by subsection (a) of this section shall be determined by the Medicaid claims information from the DHCF Medicaid Management Information System.

(e)

If the total amount of the assessments to be collected for a fiscal year is inadequate to cover disbursements required under § 47-1271(b), the Mayor may raise the assessment to the maximum allowed under federal law.

Mar. 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-68, § 2(b), 53 DCR 47
Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 5032(c), 57 DCR 6242
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-169, § 33(b)(6), 59 DCR 5567
Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 5022(c), 60 DCR 12472
This section is referenced in § 47-1276 and § 47-1278.
D.C. Law 18-223, in subsec. (a), substituted “5.5%” for “1.5%”.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-169 substituted “ICF-IDDs” for “ICF-MRs” in the section heading; and substituted “ICF-IDD” for “ICF-MR” in (a) through (d).
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-61 rewrote the section.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 5032(c) of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 5022(c) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 5022(c) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
Section 5021 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle C of Title V of the act may be cited as the “Stevie Sellows Intermediate Care Facility Quality Improvement Act of 2013”.

Section 35 of D.C. Law 19-169 provided that no provision of the act shall impair any right or obligation existing under law.

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.